tr: Yapışkan dikiş bandı malzemesi: Pamuklu taşıyıcı; Etilen vinil asetat (EVA); File taşıyıcı; Dokumasız taşıyıcı; Poliamid (PA); Polyester (PES); Polietilen (PE); Termoplastik poliüretan (TPU); Diğer
en: Fusible seam tape material: Cotton carrier; Ethylene-vinyl acetate (EVA); Mesh carrier; Non-woven carrier; Polyamide (PA); Polyester (PES); Polyethylene (PE); Thermoplastic polyurethane (TPU); Other
fr: Matériau du ruban thermocollant pour coutures: Support en coton; Éthylène-acétate de vinyle (EVA); Support en maille; Support non tissé; Polyamide (PA); Polyester (PES); Polyéthylène (PE); Polyuréthane thermoplastique (TPU); Autre
zh-TW: 熱熔接縫膠帶材質: 棉質載體; 乙烯醋酸乙烯酯共聚物 (EVA); 網眼載體; 不織布載體; 聚醯胺 (PA); 聚酯纖維 (PES); 聚乙烯 (PE); 熱塑性聚氨酯 (TPU); 其他
nb: Smeltebåndmateriale for søm: Bomullsbærer; Etylen-vinylacetat (EVA); Nettingbærer; Ikke-vevd bærer; Polyamid (PA); Polyester (PES); Polyetylen (PE); Termoplastisk polyuretan (TPU); Annet
bg-BG: Материал на термолентата за шевове: Памучна основа; Етиленвинилацетат (EVA); Мрежеста основа; Нетъкана основа; Полиамид (PA); Полиестер (PES); Полиетилен (PE); Термопластичен полиуретан (TPU); Друго
es: Material de cinta termoadhesiva para costuras: Soporte de algodón; Etilvinilacetato (EVA); Soporte de malla; Soporte no tejido; Poliamida (PA); Poliéster (PES); Polietileno (PE); Poliuretano termoplástico (TPU); Otro
it: Materiale per nastro termoadesivo per cuciture: Supporto in cotone; Etilene acetato di vinile (EVA); Supporto in rete; Supporto in tessuto non tessuto; Poliammide (PA); Poliestere (PES); Polietilene (PE); Poliuretano termoplastico (TPU); Altro
pt-BR: Material da fita de costura termocolante: Suporte de algodão; Etileno acetato de vinila (EVA); Suporte de malha; Suporte de não tecido; Poliamida (PA); Poliéster (PES); Polietileno (PE); Poliuretano termoplástico (TPU); Outro
fi: Silitettävän saumateipin materiaali: Puuvillapohjainen; Etyleenivinyyliasetaatti (EVA); Verkkopohjainen; Kuitukangaspohjainen; Polyamidi (PA); Polyesteri (PES); Polyeteeni (PE); Termoplastinen polyuretaani (TPU); Muu
sk-SK: Materiál tavnej pásky na švy: Bavlnený nosič; Etylénvinylacetát (EVA); Sieťovaný nosič; Netkaný nosič; Polyamid (PA); Polyester (PES); Polyetylén (PE); Termoplastický polyuretán (TPU); Iný
ro-RO: Material de bandă de cusătură fuzibilă: Bază din bumbac; Etilen vinil acetat (EVA); Bază din plasă; Bază nețesută; Poliamidă (PA); Poliester (PES); Polietilenă (PE); Poliuretan termoplastic (TPU); Altele
hu: Olvadó varratszalag anyaga: Pamut hordozó; Etilén-vinil-acetát (EVA); Hálós hordozó; Nem szőtt hordozó; Poliamid (PA); Poliészter (PES); Polietilén (PE); Hőre lágyuló poliuretán (TPU); Egyéb
cs: Materiál nažehlovací lemovací pásky: Bavlněný nosič; Ethylen vinylacetát (EVA); Síťovaný nosič; Netkaný nosič; Polyamid (PA); Polyester (PES); Polyethylen (PE); Termoplastický polyuretan (TPU); Ostatní
pl: Materiał na taśmę łączącą: Nośnik bawełniany; Etylen-octan winylu (EVA); Nośnik siatkowy; Nośnik włókninowy; Poliamid (PA); Poliester (PES); Polietylen (PE); Poliuretan termoplastyczny (TPU); Inny
de: Material des Schmelzklebebands: Baumwollträger; Ethylen-Vinylacetat (EVA); Netzträger; Vliesträger; Polyamid (PA); Polyester (PES); Polyethylen (PE); Thermoplastisches Polyurethan (TPU); Sonstige
da: Materiale i smeltebånd til sømme: Bomuldsbærer; Ethylen-vinylacetat (EVA); Netbærer; Non-woven-bærer; Polyamid (PA); Polyester (PES); Polyethylen (PE); Termoplastisk polyurethan (TPU); Andet
ru: Материал плавкой ленты для швов: Основа из хлопка; Этиленвинилацетат (EVA); Сетчатая основа; Нетканая основа; Полиамид (PA); Полиэстер (PES); Полиэтилен (PE); Термопластичный полиуретан (TPU); Другое
lt-LT: Lydžios siūlių juostos medžiaga: Medvilninis pagrindas; Etileno vinilacetatas (EVA); Tinklelio pagrindas; Neaustinis pagrindas; Poliamidas (PA); Poliesteris (PES); Polietilenas (PE); Termoplastinis poliuretanas (TPU); Kita
pt-PT: Material de fita adesiva termocolante: Suporte de algodão; Etileno acetato de vinilo (EVA); Suporte em rede; Suporte não tecido; Poliamida (PA); Poliéster (PES); Polietileno (PE); Poliuretano termoplástico (TPU); Outro
vi: Chất liệu băng keo đường may nhiệt: Vật liệu nền cotton; Ethylene-vinyl acetate (EVA); Vật liệu nền dạng lưới; Vật liệu nền không dệt; Polyamide (PA); Polyester (PES); Polyethylene (PE); Polyurethane nhiệt dẻo (TPU); Khác
nl: Smeltbare naadtape materiaal: Katoenen drager; Ethyleen-vinylacetaat (EVA); Gaasdrager; Non-woven drager; Polyamide (PA); Polyester (PES); Polyethyleen (PE); Thermoplastisch polyurethaan (TPU); Anders
sl-SI: Material talilnega traku za šive: Bombažna podlaga; Etilen-vinil acetat (EVA); Mrežasta podlaga; Netkana podlaga; Poliamid (PA); Poliester (PES); Polietilen (PE); Termoplastični poliuretan (TPU); Drugo
ja: 接着式シームテープ素材: コットンキャリア; エチレン酢酸ビニルアセテート (EVA); メッシュキャリア; 不織布キャリア; ポリアミド (PA); ポリエステル (PES); ポリエチレン (PE); 熱可塑性ポリウレタン (TPU); その他
el: Υλικό θερμοκολλητικής ταινίας ραφών: Φορέας από βαμβάκι; Οξικό αιθυλένιο-βινύλιο (EVA); Φορέας από πλέγμα; Μη υφασμένος φορέας; Πολυαμίδιο (PA); Πολυεστέρας (PES); Πολυαιθυλένιο (PE); Θερμοπλαστική πολυουρεθάνη (TPU); Άλλο
hr-HR: Materijal za topljivu traku za šavove: Pamučna osnova; Ethylene-vinyl acetate (EVA); Mrežasta osnova; Netkana osnova; Polyamide (PA); Poliester (PES); Polyethylene (PE); Thermoplastic polyurethane (TPU); Ostalo
sv: Smältbart sömbandsmaterial: Bomullsbärare; Eten-vinylacetat (EVA); Nätbärare; Non-woven-bärare; Polyamid (PA); Polyester (PES); Polyeten (PE); Termoplastisk polyuretan (TPU); Övrigt
th: วัสดุเทปปิดรอยต่อแบบหลอมละลาย: วัสดุรองรับผ้าฝ้าย; อีทิลีนไวนิลอะเซเทต (EVA); แผ่นรองตาข่าย; แผ่นรองผ้านอนวูฟเวน; โพลิอะไมด์ (PA); โพลิเอสเตอร์ (PES); โพลิเอทิลีน (PE); โพลิยูรีเทนเทอร์โมพลาสติก (TPU); อื่นๆ
ko: 접착식 심 테이프 소재: 면 캐리어; 에틸렌 비닐 아세테이트(EVA); 메쉬 캐리어; 부직포 캐리어; 폴리아미드(PA); 폴리에스터(PES); 폴리에틸렌(PE); 열가소성 폴리우레탄(TPU); 기타
zh-CN: 可熔接缝胶带材质: 棉载体; 乙烯醋酸乙烯酯 (EVA); 网格载体; 无纺布载体; 聚酰胺 (PA); 聚酯纤维 (PES); 聚乙烯 (PE); 热塑性聚氨酯 (TPU); 其他